Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.045

Pension benefits for widows or widowers of unretired, eligible firefighters—Retroactive.

Upon the death of a firefighter who is eligible to retire under RCW 41.18.040 as now or hereafter amended, but who has not retired, a pension shall be paid to his widow or her widower at the same monthly rate that he or she was eligible to receive at the time of his or her death, if such widow or widower was his wife or her husband for a period of five years prior to his or her death. If there be no widow or widower, then such monthly payments shall be distributed to and divided among his or her children, share and share alike, until they reach the age of eighteen or are married, whichever comes first.

This section shall apply retroactively for the benefit of all widows or widowers and survivors of firefighters who died after January 1, 1967, if such firefighters were otherwise eligible to retire on the date of death.

[ 2007 c 218 s 46; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 71; 1969 ex.s. c 209 s 25.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.

Effective date—Severability—Construction—1969 ex.s. c 209: See RCW 41.26.3901, 41.26.3902, and 41.26.3903.